Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2937.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-207, to read: START_STATUTE23-207. Nuclear power plant owners or operators; skilled workforce; requirements; rules; definitions A. A nuclear power plant owner or operator shall require contractors and subcontractors to use a skilled and trained workforce that includes both of the following: 1. Registered apprentices who are participating in an apprenticeship program that is approved by the commission or the united states department of labor or another equivalent program as determined by the commission in rule. 2. Skilled journeymen, who shall comprise the following amounts of the workforce: (a) On or before January 1, 2027, thirty percent. (b) On or before January 1, 2028, forty-five percent (c) On or before January 1, 2029, sixty percent. B. Each contractor and subcontractor shall pay a skilled journeyman the prevailing wage for the occupation, which must be at least the minimum wage. C. the commission shall adopt rules: 1. To verify whether an employee, contractor or subcontractor is a skilled journeyman. 2. To establish procedures for how to report workplace violations. D. If an emergent situation arises at a nuclear power plant, employees who are not skilled journeymen may assist the emergency situation until the emergent situation is resolved. E. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Commission" means the industrial commission of Arizona. 2. "Contractor and subcontractor" means any person or entity that enters into an agreement with an owner or operator of a nuclear power plant to perform outage, maintenance, repair, alteration or installation work or other work related to outage, maintenance, repair, alteration or installation work. 3. "Nuclear power plant" means a stationary nuclear fission-based electric generating facility that is located in this state and that is licensed by the united states nuclear regulatory commission. 4. "Skilled and trained workforce" means a workforce in which all workers who perform outage, maintenance, repair, alteration or installation work at a nuclear power plant are registered apprentices or skilled journeymen. 5. "Skilled journeyman" means an individual who is a graduate of an apprenticeship program that is approved by the commission or the United States department of labor. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Emergency This act is an emergency measure that is necessary to preserve the public peace, health or safety and is operative immediately as provided by law.